North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 1A. Commission for Public Health.

§ 130A-29.
Commission for Public Health — Creation, powers and duties.

The Commission for Public Health is created with the authority and duty to adopt rules to protect and promote the public health.

The Commission is authorized to adopt rules necessary to implement the public health programs administered by the Department as provided in this Chapter.

The Commission shall adopt rules:

Repealed by Session Laws 1983 (Regular Session, 1984), c. 1022, s. 5.

Establishing standards for approving sewage-treatment devices and holding tanks for marine toilets as provided in G.S. 75A-6(o).

Establishing specifications for sanitary privies for schools where water-carried sewage facilities are unavailable as provided in

G.S. 115C-522

.

Establishing requirements for the sanitation of local confinement facilities as provided in Part 2 of Article 10 of Chapter 153A of the General Statutes.

Repealed by Session Laws 1989 (Regular Session, 1990), c. 1075, s. 1.

(5a) Establishing eligibility standards for participation in Department reimbursement programs.

Repealed by Session Laws 2014-122, s. 11(a), effective September 20, 2014.

Establishing statewide health outcome objectives and delivery standards.

Establishing permit requirements for the sanitation of premises, utensils, equipment, and procedures to be used by a person engaged in tattooing, as provided in Part 11 of Article 8 of this Chapter.

Implementing immunization requirements for adult care homes as provided in

G.S. 131D-9

and for nursing homes as provided in

G.S. 131E-113

.

Pertaining to the biological agents registry in accordance with

G.S. 130A-479

.

For matters within its jurisdiction that allow for and regulate horizontal drilling and hydraulic fracturing for the purpose of oil and gas exploration and development.

The Commission is authorized to create:

Metropolitan water districts as provided in

G.S. 162A-33

;

Sanitary districts as provided in Part 2 of Article 2 of this Chapter; and

Mosquito control districts as provided in Part 2 of Article 12 of this Chapter.

Rules adopted by the Commission shall be enforced by the Department.

History.
1973, c. 476, s. 123; 1975, c. 19, s. 57; c. 694, s. 6; 1979, c. 41, s. 1; 1981, c. 614, s. 9; 1983, c. 891, s. 15; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1022, s. 5; 1989, c. 727, ss. 175, 176; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1004, s.
50; c. 1075, s. 1; 1991, c. 548, s. 2; 1993, c. 321, s. 274; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 670, s. 3; 2000-112, s. 6; 2001-469, s. 2; 2002-179, s. 2(b); 2007-182, s. 2; 2012-143, s. 2(i); 2014-122, s. 11(a).

On-Site Wastewater Task Force

Session Laws 2019-151, ss. 5-12, provide: “Section 5. There is established the On-Site Wastewater Task Force (Task Force).

“Section 6. The Task Force shall consist of 10 members, as follows:

“(1) A representative of the North Carolina Division of Public Health, On-Site Water Protection Branch.

“(2) A person currently certified as a Water Pollution Control Systems Operator and actively conducting business as an operator of on-site wastewater systems.

“(3) A representative of the North Carolina Environmental Health Supervisors Association.

“(4) A representative of the North Carolina Home Builders Association.

“(5) A representative of the North Carolina On-Site Wastewater Contractor Inspector Certification Board.

“(6) A representative of the North Carolina Licensing Board for General Contractors.

“(7) A representative of the North Carolina Septic Tank Association.

“(8) A representative of the Consulting Soil Scientists Association of North Carolina with experience conducting private consultative services of sites evaluated for on-site wastewater systems.

“(9) A representative of the North Carolina Board of Examiners for Engineers and Surveyors with experience in designing on-site wastewater systems.

“(10) A representative of the North Carolina Board for Licensing of Soil Scientists with experience conducting private consultative services of sites evaluated for on-site wastewater systems.

“Section 7. The first meeting of the Task Force shall be held no later than October 31, 2019. The Task Force member from the North Carolina Home Builders Association shall chair the first meeting of the Task Force. The permanent chair of the Task Force
shall be elected by a majority of the members of the Task Force present and voting at the first meeting. A majority of the Task Force members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. No action may be taken except
by a majority vote at a meeting at which a quorum is present.

“Section 8. The Task Force may meet at various locations around the State in order to promote greater public participation in its deliberations and to accommodate the travel considerations of the members. The Legislative Services Commission shall grant
adequate meeting space to the Task Force in the State Legislative Building or the Legislative Office Building. The Legislative Services Commission shall allocate from a portion of the funds appropriated to the General Assembly sufficient
funds for the operation of the Task Force. The Task Force may contract for professional, clerical, or consultant services as provided by

G.S. 120-32.02

. Members of the Task Force shall receive subsistence and travel expenses at the rates provided in

G.S. 120-3.1

, 138-5, or 138-6, as appropriate.

“Section 9. The Task Force shall conduct a study and issue a report to recommend new wastewater rules to the Commission of Public Health. In conducting this study, the Task Force may collaborate with any stakeholders it deems appropriate. The report must
make recommendations for all of the following:

“(1) New rules to replace the rules adopted by the Commission for Public Health and approved by the Rules Review Commission, which were to be codified in Chapter 18E of Title 15A of the North Carolina Administrative Code. The new rule recommendations
should replace the rules disapproved by Section 1 through Section 4 of this act, as well as any rules that meet all of the following criteria: (i) adoption by the Commission of Public Health on August 8, 2018, (ii) approval by the
Rules Review Commission on October 18, 2018, or November 15, 2018, (iii) codification in Chapter 18E of Title 15A of the North Carolina Administrative Code, and (iv) relation to on-site wastewater treatment and dispersal.

“(2) New rules to prevent the implementation of rules and ordinances and enforcement against the use of on-site wastewater treatment and dispersal systems in non-sewered areas of the State.

“Section 10. The Task Force shall transmit its report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources, the Environmental Review Commission, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services,
and the Commission for Public Health no later than February 1, 2020. The Task Force will terminate on the earlier of the date it transmits its report or February 1, 2020.

“Section 11. 15A NCAC 18A.1934 through.1971 shall remain in effect until new rules adopted by the Commission for Public Health to replace them become effective. 15A NCAC 18A.1934 through.1971 shall be exempt from the periodic review and expiration of
existing rules process required by

G.S. 150B-21.3

A.

“Section 12. The rules for on-site wastewater treatment and dispersal cited as 15A NCAC 18E.0101-.0102, .0104, .0201- .0207, .0301- .0302, .0304- .0305, .0501- .0507, .0509- .0510, .0601- .0602, .0701- .0703, .0801- .0804, .0901- .0911, .1001, .1103,
.1201, .1302, .1403, .1405- .1406, .1501- .1505, .1601- .1603, adopted by the Commission for Public Health on August 8, 2018, and approved by the Rules Review Commission on October 18, 2018, and November 15, 2018, shall not become
effective if the rules specifically enumerated in Sections 1 through 4 of this act are disapproved.”

Session Laws 2019-151, ss. 1-4, provide: “Section 1. Pursuant to G.S. 150B-21.3(b1), the following rules, as adopted by the North Carolina Commission for Public Health on August 8, 2018, and approved by the Rules Review Commission on October 18, 2018,
are disapproved:

“ 15A NCAC 18E.0103 (Incorporation by Reference)

“ 15A NCAC 18E.0105 (Definitions)

“ 15A NCAC 18E.0303 (Licensed or Certified Professionals)

“ 15A NCAC 18E.0401 (Design Daily Flow)

“ 15A NCAC 18E.0402 (Septic Tank Effluent Characteristics)

“ 15A NCAC 18E.0403 (Adjustments to Design Daily Flow)

“ 15A NCAC 18E.0505 (Soil Depth)

“ 15A NCAC 18E.0805 (Tank Leak Testing and Installation Requirements)

“ 15A NCAC 18E.1401 (Plans for Prefabricated Tanks)

“ 15A NCAC 18E.1402 (Tank Design and Construction)

“ 15A NCAC 18E.1404 (Plans and Specifications for Risers, Effluent Filters, and Pipe Penetration Boots)

“Section 2. Pursuant to G.S. 150B-21.3(b1), the following rules, as adopted by the North Carolina Commission for Public Health on August 8, 2018, and approved by the Rules Review Commission on November 15, 2018, are disapproved:

“ 15A NCAC 18E.1002 (Reclaimed Water Systems)

“ 15A NCAC 18E.1101 (General Dosing System Requirements)

“ 15A NCAC 18E.1102 (Pump Dosing)

“ 15A NCAC 18E.1104 (Siphon Dosing)

“ 15A NCAC 18E.1105 (Timed Dosing)

“ 15A NCAC 18E.1106 (Pressure Dosed Gravity Distribution Devices)

“ 15A NCAC 18E.1202 (Siting and Sizing Criteria for Advanced Pretreatment Systems with a Design Daily Flow Less Than or Equal to 1,500 Gallons/Day)

“ 15A NCAC 18E.1203 (Siting and Sizing Criteria for Advanced Pretreatment Systems with a Design Daily Flow Greater Than 1,500 Gallons/Day and Less Than or Equal to 3,000 Gallons/Day)

“ 15A NCAC 18E.1204 (Advanced Pretreatment Drip Dispersal Systems)

“ 15A NCAC 18E.1205 (Advanced Pretreatment Sand Lined Trench Systems)

“ 15A NCAC 18E.1206 (Advanced Pretreatment Bed Systems)

“ 15A NCAC 18E.1303 (Owner Responsibilities for Wastewater System Operation and Maintenance)

“ 15A NCAC 18E.1304 (Management Entity Responsibilities for Wastewater System Operation and Maintenance)

“ 15A NCAC 18E.1305 (Local Health Department Responsibilities for Wastewater System Operation and Maintenance)

“ 15A NCAC 18E.1306 (System Malfunction and Repair)

“ 15A NCAC 18E.1307 (Wastewater System Abandonment)

“ 15A NCAC 18E.1701 (General)

“ 15A NCAC 18E.1702 (Application)

“ 15A NCAC 18E.1703 (Department and Commission Application Review)

“ 15A NCAC 18E.1704 (Approval Criteria for Provisional Systems)

“ 15A NCAC 18E.1705 (Approval Criteria for Innovative Systems)

“ 15A NCAC 18E.1706 (Approval Criteria for Accepted Systems)

“ 15A NCAC 18E.1707 (Design and Installation Criteria for Provisional, Innovative, and Accepted Approvals)

“ 15A NCAC 18E.1709 (Wastewater Sampling Requirements for Advanced Pretreatment Systems)

“ 15A NCAC 18E.1710 (Compliance Criteria for Advanced Pretreatment Systems)

“ 15A NCAC 18E.1711 (Provisional and Innovative Approval Renewal)

“ 15A NCAC 18E.1712 (Authorized Designers, Installers, and Management Entities)

“ 15A NCAC 18E.1713 (Local Health Department Responsibilities)

“Section 3. Pursuant to G.S. 150B-21.3(b1) and S.L. 2015-147, the following rules, as adopted by the North Carolina Commission for Public Health on August 8, 2018, are disapproved:

“ 15A NCAC 18E.0508 (Available Space)

“ 15A NCAC 18E.1301 (Operation and Maintenance of Wastewater Systems)

“Section 4. Pursuant to G.S. 150B-21.3(b1) and S.L. 2014-120, Section 47, the following rule, as adopted by the North Carolina Commission for Public Health on August 8, 2018, is disapproved:

“ 15A NCAC 18E.1708 (Modification, Suspension, and Revocation of Approvals).”

Establish Standards and Pilot Program for Highly Treated Wastewater.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 8.26(a)-(g) provides: “(a) The following definitions apply in this section:

“(1) Highly treated wastewater. – Effluent discharged from a wastewater system that is designed and operated to meet the following standards:

“a. With respect to the carbonaceous biological oxygen demand (CBOD5), 10mg/L.

“b. With respect to NH3, 10mg/L.

“c. With respect to total nitrogen, 10mg/L, or a minimum of sixty percent (60%) reduction from the influent total Kjeldahl nitrogen.

“d. With respect to total phosphorus, 5mg/L, unless discharged into nutrient sensitive waters.

“e. With respect to fecal coliforms, 10 colonies/100mL.

“f. Capture and removal of residual sludge and biogases.

“g. With respect to total suspended solids, less than or equal to 10mg/L.

“(2) Wastewater system. – Defined in

G.S. 130A-334

.

“(b) Funds allocated from the State Fiscal Recovery Fund to the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina for the Innovative Highly Treated Wastewater Pilot Program (Program) shall be provided to the North Carolina Policy Collaboratory at
the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill (Collaboratory) to establish the Program as described in this subsection. The Collaboratory may use up to one million dollars ($1,000,000) of the funds allocated by this subsection for
research and administrative costs related to the Program, of which up to two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) may be used to reimburse the Department of Environmental Quality for its administrative costs. Project funding from the
funds allocated by this section is limited to the lesser of forty percent (40%) of the total project cost or four million dollars ($4,000,000). In implementing the Program, the Collaboratory shall do the following:

“(1) Review and evaluate wastewater systems producing highly treated wastewater, either as a single unit or as a combination of treatment devices for suitability as a wastewater treatment option for local governments, sanitary districts, or public authorities
considered distressed, as defined by

G.S. 159G-20

, that (i) have no more than 10,000 customers or (ii) include residential or commercial developments or subdivisions that are unable to be served by existing wastewater systems.

“(2) Identify no less than five local governments, sanitary districts, or public authorities meeting the criteria set forth in subdivision (1) of this subsection as participants in the Program.

“(3) Work with Program participants to submit permit applications to the Department of Environmental Quality and, upon permit approval, to construct the wastewater systems.

“(4) Conduct research and monitoring to quantify the efficacy of the wastewater systems funded and built as part of the Program. The Collaboratory shall share results of this research with Program participants and the Department.

“(c) The Department of Environmental Quality shall do the following with respect to entities receiving wastewater systems producing highly treated wastewater under subsection (b) of this section to the extent not inconsistent with its National Pollutant
Discharge Elimination System permitting authority delegated from the United States Environmental Protection Agency:

“(1) Review and qualify wastewater systems producing highly treated wastewater, either as a single unit or as a combination of treatment devices. The Department shall require the manufacturer of the wastewater system within five days of the qualification
under this subdivision to file with the Department a performance bond or other surety with a minimum term of five years to be executed in favor of the permittee in the amount sufficient to cover system replacement. Operation, maintenance,
abuse, or change in hydraulic flows or wastewater characteristics shall not be attached to the performance bond or surety.

“(2) Work with the entities identified under subsection (b) of this section to permit the wastewater systems meeting the standards for highly treated wastewater set forth in subsection (a) of this section. The system must be consistent with the action
plan developed by the entities as set forth in G.S. 159G-45(b)(3).

“(d) No later than December 1, 2024, the Collaboratory, with the assistance of the Department of Environmental Quality, shall provide a report to the Environmental Management Commission and the Environmental Review Commission evaluating the systems permitted
under the pilot program established in this section. The report shall assess the effectiveness of these systems compared to the systems previously operated by the local government, sanitary district, or public authority, along with
suggestions for further legislation and rulemaking necessary to support the adoption of highly treated wastewater systems.

“(e) The Commission for Public Health shall adopt temporary and permanent rules to provide for approval of treatment system applications for use in the State and create benefits for systems producing higher wastewater treatment levels that are proportional
and graduated. These rules shall include, at a minimum, the following:

“(1) Subject to the requirements of subdivision (4) of this subsection, applications for provisional wastewater systems, as defined in G.S. 130A-343(a)(7), from manufacturers of wastewater systems with certification and listing for one or more years from
a nationally recognized certification body, as defined in G.S. 130A-343(a)(6), shall be approved within 45 days of receipt of a complete application. The proposed wastewater system listed in the application shall be identical in design
and features to the wastewater system certified and listed by the nationally recognized certification body.

“(2) Subject to the requirements of subdivision (4) of this subsection, applications for proposed wastewater systems without certification and listing from a nationally recognized certification body, as defined in G.S. 130A-343(a)(6), shall be approved
as provisional and shall allow the issuance of a maximum of 200 improvement permits and authorizations for wastewater system construction.

“(3) Subject to the requirements of subdivision (4) of this subsection, applications for innovative status of a wastewater system shall be approved (i) after two years of certification and listing by a nationally recognized certification body and one
year of field data in this State or other states or countries approved by DHHS or (ii) if not listed by a nationally recognized body, after completion of provisional status requirements in accordance with G.S. 130A-343(f). For systems
receiving innovative status as a result of receiving national certification, those systems shall be identical to the system certified and listed by the nationally recognized certification body and identical to the systems installed
in this State and approved by DHHS or other states or countries.

“(4) Applications for wastewater systems and dispersal products received after the effective date of this subsection shall demonstrate structural integrity, including subjecting the trench system to axle load of 16,000 pounds when covered with 12 inches
of compacted soil and 4,000 pounds when covered with 6 inches of compacted soil without breakage, collapse, fracture, or compression that prevents the downline distribution of wastewater. Wastewater treatment devices with identifying
surface or above grade access for operation and maintenance shall be excluded from load testing when installed and backfilled in accordance with the rules or the product approval.

“(5) Wastewater systems found by DHHS to meet standards for reclaimed water based on (i) field demonstrations over a two-year period in this State or other states approved by DHHS that the system meets reclaimed water standards or (ii) certification and
listing by a nationally recognized body, such as the National Sanitation Foundation Standard 350, shall be approved for designs that eliminate repair area rules in Type I soils. Elimination of repair areas shall be considered for domestic
strength wastewater only. Systems permitted without repair area under this subsection shall be classified by DHHS as a Type VI(b) system under DHHS rules and shall be inspected no less than 12 times per year.

“(6) Vertical and horizontal restrictions to property lines and limiting conditions for systems approved under this subsection shall be reduced proportionally to the graduated increases in wastewater quality.

“(f) The Commission for Public Health and the Department of Health and Human Services shall report quarterly on their implementation of subsection (d) of this section beginning no later than May 1, 2022, and shall continue quarterly reporting until rulemaking
activities required by this section have been completed.

“(g) This section is effective when it becomes law. Funds allocated by this section that are not spent or encumbered by June 30, 2024, shall revert to the Wastewater Reserve to be used for any of the purposes authorized in

G.S. 159G-32(b)

.”

§ 130A-30.
Commission for Public Health — Members; selection; quorum; compensation.

The Commission for Public Health shall consist of 13 members, four of whom shall be elected by the North Carolina Medical Society and nine of whom shall be appointed by the Governor.

One of the members appointed by the Governor shall be a licensed pharmacist, one a registered engineer experienced in sanitary engineering or a soil scientist, one a licensed veterinarian, one a licensed optometrist, one a licensed dentist, and one a
registered nurse. The initial members of the Commission shall be the members of the State Board of Health who shall serve for a period equal to the remainder of their current terms on the State Board of Health, three of whose appointments
expire May 1, 1973, and two of whose appointments expire May 1, 1975. At the end of the respective terms of office of initial members of the Commission, their successors shall be appointed for terms of four years and until their
successors are appointed and qualify. Any appointment to fill a vacancy on the Commission created by the resignation, dismissal, death, or disability of a member shall be for the balance of the unexpired term.

The North Carolina Medical Society shall have the right to remove any member elected by it for misfeasance, malfeasance, or nonfeasance, and the Governor shall have the right to remove any member appointed by him for misfeasance, malfeasance, or nonfeasance
in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 143B-13

. Vacancies on said Commission among the membership elected by the North Carolina Medical Society shall be filled by the executive committee of the Medical Society until the next meeting of the Medical Society, when
the Medical Society shall fill the vacancy for the unexpired term. Vacancies on said Commission among the membership appointed by the Governor shall be filled by the Governor for the unexpired term.

A majority of the members of the Commission shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

The members of the Commission shall receive per diem and necessary traveling and subsistence expenses in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 138-5

.

History.
1973, c. 476, s. 124; c. 1367, ss. 1, 2; 1981, c. 553; 1989, c. 727, ss. 175, 177; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1004, s. 51; 1995, c. 507, s. 26.8(d); 2007-182, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-182, s. 2, effective July 5, 2007, substituted “Commission for Public Health” for “Commission for Health Services” in the section heading and in subsection (a).

§ 130A-31.
Commission for Public Health — Officers.

The Commission for Public Health shall have a chairman and a vice-chairman. The chairman shall be designated by the Governor from among the members of the Commission to serve as chairman at his pleasure. The vice-chairman shall be elected by and from
the members of the Commission and shall serve for a term of two years or until the expiration of his regularly appointed term.

History.
1973, c. 476, s. 125; 1989, c. 727, s. 175; 2007-182, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-182, s. 2, effective July 5, 2007, substituted “Commission for Public Health” for “Commission for Health Services” in the section heading and in the section text.

Legal Periodicals.

For note, “Preemption Hogwash: North Carolina’s Judicial Repeal of Local Authority to Regulate Hog Farms in Craig v. County of Chatham,” see 80 N.C.L. Rev. 2121 (2002).

§ 130A-32.
Commission for Public Health — Election meetings.

The meeting of the Commission for Public Health for the election of vice-chairman shall be at the first regular meeting after the joint session of the Commission for Public Health and the North Carolina Medical Society at the annual meeting of the North
Carolina Medical Society each odd-numbered year.

History.
1973, c. 476, s. 126; 1989, c. 727, s. 175; 2007-182, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-182, s. 2, effective July 5, 2007, substituted “Commission for Public Health” for “Commission for Health Services” in the section heading and twice in the section text.

§ 130A-33.
Commission for Public Health — Regular and special meetings.

Each year there shall be four regular meetings of the Commission for Public Health, one of which shall be held conjointly with a general session of the annual meeting of the North Carolina Medical Society. The State Health Director shall submit an annual
report on public health at this meeting. The other three meetings shall be at such times and places as the chairman of the Commission shall designate. Special meetings of the Commission may be called by the chairman, or by a majority
of the members of the Commission.

History.
1973, c. 476, s. 127; 1989, c. 727, ss. 175, 178; 1993, c. 513, s. 6; 2007-182, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-182, s. 2, effective July 5, 2007, substituted “Commission for Public Health” for “Commission for Health Services” in the section heading and in the section text.

§§ 130A-33.1 through 130A-33.29.

Reserved for future codification purposes.